Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1534
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1534 to 81-1566 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB568, § 1.
December 1, 2020